Illinois, session 104th, HB3536.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Oaths and Affirmations Act is amended by 5changing Section 1 as follows: 6    (5 ILCS 255/1)  (from Ch. 101, par. 1)7    Sec. 1. Oaths and affirmations. 8    (a) All courts, and all judges and the clerk thereof, the 9county clerk, deputy county clerk, notaries public, and 10persons certified under the Illinois Certified Shorthand 11Reporters Act of 1984 have the power to administer oaths and 12affirmations to witnesses and others, concerning anything 13commenced or to be commenced, or pending before them 14respectively.15    (b) The same functions may be performed by an 16administrative law judge, hearing officer, or adjudicator when 17presiding over a proceeding for a local public entity, as 18defined in Section 1-206 of the Local Governmental and 19Governmental Employees Tort Immunity Act, including a 20proceeding under the Counties Code, the Illinois Municipal 21Code, or Section 11-208.3 of the Illinois Vehicle Code, if the 22administrative law judge, hearing officer, or adjudicator has 23neither been convicted of a felony nor removed from office by   HB3536- 2 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1the Illinois Courts Commission.2(Source: P.A. 90-294, eff. 8-1-97.) 3    Section 10. The Counties Code is amended by changing 4Sections 5-43010, 5-43020, 5-43025, and 5-43030 as follows: 5    (55 ILCS 5/5-43010)6    Sec. 5-43010. Administrative adjudication of code and 7ordinance violations; definitions. 8    (a) Any county may provide by ordinance for a system of 9administrative adjudication of county code violations to the 10extent permitted by the Illinois Constitution.11    (b) Any county may provide by ordinance for a system of 12administrative adjudication of violations of ordinances 13enacted by a participating unit of local government only 14where: (i) the unit of local government is engaging in 15governmental activities or providing services within the 16boundaries of the county; (ii) the unit of local government 17has no system of administrative adjudication; and (iii) the 18violation occurred within the boundaries of the county.19    (c) As used in this Division:20    "Administrative law judge" means an independent contractor 21or employee compensated by a local public entity, as defined 22in Section 1-206 of the Local Governmental and Governmental 23Employees Tort Immunity Act, who serves in a quasi-judicial 24function regardless of the independent contractor's title.   HB3536- 3 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    "Participating unit of local government" means a unit of 2local government which has entered into an intergovernmental 3agreement or contract with a county for the administrative 4adjudication of violations of its ordinances by the county 5pursuant to this Division. 6    "System of administrative adjudication" means the 7adjudication of any violation of a county ordinance or of a 8participating unit of local government's ordinance, except for 9(i) proceedings not within the statutory or the home rule 10authority of counties or a participating unit of local 11government; and (ii) any offense under the Illinois Vehicle 12Code (or a similar offense that is a traffic regulation 13governing the movement of vehicles and except for any 14reportable offense under Section 6-204 of the Illinois Vehicle 15Code).16    "Unit of local government" has the meaning as defined in 17the Illinois Constitution of 1970 and also includes a 18not-for-profit corporation organized for the purpose of 19conducting public business including, but not limited to, the 20Northeast Illinois Regional Commuter Railroad Corporation. 21(Source: P.A. 99-754, eff. 1-1-17.) 22    (55 ILCS 5/5-43020)23    Sec. 5-43020. Code hearing units; powers of hearing 24officers. 25    (a) An ordinance establishing a system of administrative   HB3536- 4 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1adjudication, pursuant to this Division, shall provide for a 2code hearing unit within an existing agency or as a separate 3agency in the county government. The ordinance shall establish 4the jurisdiction of a code hearing unit that is consistent 5with this Division. The "jurisdiction" of a code hearing unit 6refers to the particular code violations that it may 7adjudicate.8    (b) Adjudicatory hearings shall be presided over by 9hearing officers. The powers and duties of a hearing officer 10shall include:11        (1) hearing testimony and accepting evidence that is 12    relevant to the existence of the code violation;13        (2) issuing subpoenas directing witnesses to appear 14    and give relevant testimony at the hearing, upon the 15    request of the parties or their representatives;16        (3) preserving and authenticating the record of the 17    hearing and all exhibits and evidence introduced at the 18    hearing;19        (4) issuing a determination, based on the evidence 20    presented at the hearing, of whether a code violation 21    exists, which shall be in writing and shall include a 22    written finding of fact, decision, and order including the 23    fine, penalty, or action with which the defendant must 24    comply; and25        (5) imposing penalties consistent with applicable code 26    provisions and assessing costs upon finding a party liable   HB3536- 5 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    for the charged violation, except, however, that in no 2    event shall the hearing officer have authority to: (i) 3    impose a penalty of incarceration; or (ii) impose a fine 4    in excess of $50,000, or at the option of the county for a 5    fine imposed for a violation of a county ordinance or at 6    the option of a participating unit of local government for 7    a fine imposed for violation of an ordinance of the 8    participating unit of local government, such other amount 9    not to exceed the maximum amount established by the 10    Mandatory Arbitration System as prescribed by the Rules of 11    the Illinois Supreme Court from time to time for the 12    judicial circuit in which the county is located. The 13    maximum monetary fine under this item (5), shall be 14    exclusive of costs of enforcement or costs imposed to 15    secure compliance with the county's ordinances or 16    participating unit of local government's ordinances and 17    shall not be applicable to cases to enforce the collection 18    of any tax imposed and collected by the county or 19    participating unit of local government; and 20        (6) swearing in individuals who provide testimony.21    (c) Prior to conducting administrative adjudication 22proceedings, administrative hearing officers shall have 23successfully completed a formal training program that includes 24the following:25        (1) instruction on the rules of procedure of the 26    administrative hearings that they will conduct;  HB3536- 6 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1        (2) orientation to each subject area of the code 2    violations that they will adjudicate;3        (3) observation of administrative hearings; and4        (4) participation in hypothetical cases, including 5    ruling on evidence and issuing final orders. 6    In addition, every administrative hearing officer must be 7an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois 8for at least 3 years.9    (d) A proceeding before a code hearing unit shall be 10instituted upon the filing of a written pleading by an 11authorized official of the county or participating unit of 12local government. 13(Source: P.A. 99-754, eff. 1-1-17.) 14    (55 ILCS 5/5-43025)15    Sec. 5-43025. Administrative hearing proceedings.16    (a) Any ordinance establishing a system of administrative 17adjudication, pursuant to this Division, shall afford parties 18due process of law, including notice and opportunity for 19hearing. Parties shall be served with process in a manner 20reasonably calculated to give them actual notice, including, 21as appropriate, personal service of process upon a party or 22its employees or agents; service by mail at a party's address; 23or notice that is posted upon the property where the violation 24is found when the party is the owner or manager of the 25property. In counties with a population under 3,000,000, if   HB3536- 7 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1the notice requires the respondent to answer within a certain 2amount of time, the county or participating unit of local 3government must reply to the answer within the same amount of 4time afforded to the respondent.5    (b) Parties shall be given notice of an adjudicatory 6hearing that includes the type and nature of the code 7violation to be adjudicated, the date and location of the 8adjudicatory hearing, the legal authority and jurisdiction 9under which the hearing is to be held, and the penalties for 10failure to appear at the hearing.11    (c) Parties shall be provided with an opportunity for a 12hearing during which they may be represented by counsel, 13present witnesses, and cross-examine opposing witnesses. 14Parties may request the hearing officer to issue subpoenas to 15direct the attendance and testimony of relevant witnesses and 16the production of relevant documents. Hearings shall be 17scheduled with reasonable promptness, except that for hearings 18scheduled in all non-emergency situations, if requested by the 19defendant, the defendant shall have at least 15 days after 20service of process to prepare for a hearing. For purposes of 21this subsection (c), "non-emergency situation" means any 22situation that does not reasonably constitute a threat to the 23public interest, safety, or welfare. If service is provided by 24mail, the 15-day period shall begin to run on the day that the 25notice is deposited in the mail.26    (d) All oral testimony shall be sworn to under oath or   HB3536- 8 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1affirmation. 2(Source: P.A. 99-754, eff. 1-1-17.) 3    (55 ILCS 5/5-43030)4    Sec. 5-43030. Rules of evidence shall not govern. 5    (a) The formal and technical rules of evidence do not 6apply in an adjudicatory hearing permitted under this 7Division. Evidence, including hearsay, may be admitted only if 8it is of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent 9persons in the conduct of their affairs.10    (b) A citation or notice of violation sworn to under oath 11or affirmation taken under certification under Section 1-109 12of the Code of Civil Procedure is prima facie evidence of the 13correctness of the facts specified therein. The standard for 14rebutting this presumption is a preponderance of the evidence. 15(Source: P.A. 96-1386, eff. 7-29-10.) 16    Section 15. The Illinois Municipal Code is amended by 17changing Sections 1-2.1-2, 1-2.1-4, 1-2.1-5, and 1-2.1-6 as 18follows: 19    (65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-2)20    Sec. 1-2.1-2. Administrative adjudication of municipal 21code violations. 22    (a) Any municipality may provide by ordinance for a system 23of administrative adjudication of municipal code violations to   HB3536- 9 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1the extent permitted by the Illinois Constitution. 2    (b) As used in this Division: A 3    "Administrative law judge" means an independent contractor 4or employee compensated by a local public entity, as defined 5in Section 1-206 of the Local Governmental and Governmental 6Employees Tort Immunity Act, who serves in a quasi-judicial 7function regardless of the independent contractor's title.8    "System system of administrative adjudication" means the 9adjudication of any violation of a municipal ordinance, except 10for (i) proceedings not within the statutory or the home rule 11authority of municipalities; and (ii) any offense under the 12Illinois Vehicle Code or a similar offense that is a traffic 13regulation governing the movement of vehicles and except for 14any reportable offense under Section 6-204 of the Illinois 15Vehicle Code.16(Source: P.A. 90-516, eff. 1-1-98.) 17    (65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-4)18    Sec. 1-2.1-4. Code hearing units; powers of hearing 19officers. 20    (a) An ordinance establishing a system of administrative 21adjudication, pursuant to this Division, shall provide for a 22code hearing unit within an existing agency or as a separate 23agency in the municipal government. The ordinance shall 24establish the jurisdiction of a code hearing unit that is 25consistent with this Division. The "jurisdiction" of a code   HB3536- 10 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1hearing unit refers to the particular code violations that it 2may adjudicate.3    (b) Adjudicatory hearings shall be presided over by 4hearing officers. The powers and duties of a hearing officer 5shall include: 6        (1) hearing testimony and accepting evidence that is 7    relevant to the existence of the code violation; 8        (2) issuing subpoenas directing witnesses to appear 9    and give relevant testimony at the hearing, upon the 10    request of the parties or their representatives; 11        (3) preserving and authenticating the record of the 12    hearing and all exhibits and evidence introduced at the 13    hearing; 14        (4) issuing a determination, based on the evidence 15    presented at the hearing, of whether a code violation 16    exists. The determination shall be in writing and shall 17    include a written finding of fact, decision, and order 18    including the fine, penalty, or action with which the 19    defendant must comply; and 20        (5) imposing penalties consistent with applicable code 21    provisions and assessing costs upon finding a party liable 22    for the charged violation, except, however, that in no 23    event shall the hearing officer have authority to (i) 24    impose a penalty of incarceration, or (ii) impose a fine 25    in excess of $50,000, or at the option of the 26    municipality, such other amount not to exceed the maximum   HB3536- 11 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    amount established by the Mandatory Arbitration System as 2    prescribed by the Rules of the Illinois Supreme Court from 3    time to time for the judicial circuit in which the 4    municipality is located. The maximum monetary fine under 5    this item (5), shall be exclusive of costs of enforcement 6    or costs imposed to secure compliance with the 7    municipality's ordinances and shall not be applicable to 8    cases to enforce the collection of any tax imposed and 9    collected by the municipality; and 10        (6) swearing in individuals who provide testimony.11    (c) Prior to conducting administrative adjudication 12proceedings, administrative hearing officers shall have 13successfully completed a formal training program which 14includes the following: 15        (1) instruction on the rules of procedure of the 16    administrative hearings which they will conduct; 17        (2) orientation to each subject area of the code 18    violations that they will adjudicate; 19        (3) observation of administrative hearings; and 20        (4) participation in hypothetical cases, including 21    ruling on evidence and issuing final orders.22    In addition, every administrative hearing officer must be 23an attorney licensed to practice law in the State of Illinois 24for at least 3 years. A person who has served as a judge in 25Illinois is not required to fulfill the requirements of items 26(1) through (4) of this subsection.  HB3536- 12 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    (d) A proceeding before a code hearing unit shall be 2instituted upon the filing of a written pleading by an 3authorized official of the municipality.4(Source: P.A. 102-65, eff. 7-9-21.) 5    (65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-5)6    Sec. 1-2.1-5. Administrative hearing proceedings. 7    (a) Any ordinance establishing a system of administrative 8adjudication, pursuant to this Division, shall afford parties 9due process of law, including notice and opportunity for 10hearing. Parties shall be served with process in a manner 11reasonably calculated to give them actual notice, including, 12as appropriate, personal service of process upon a party or 13its employees or agents; service by mail at a party's address; 14or notice that is posted upon the property where the violation 15is found when the party is the owner or manager of the 16property. In municipalities with a population under 3,000,000, 17if the notice requires the respondent to answer within a 18certain amount of time, the municipality must reply to the 19answer within the same amount of time afforded to the 20respondent. 21    (b) Parties shall be given notice of an adjudicatory 22hearing which includes the type and nature of the code 23violation to be adjudicated, the date and location of the 24adjudicatory hearing, the legal authority and jurisdiction 25under which the hearing is to be held, and the penalties for   HB3536- 13 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1failure to appear at the hearing. 2    (c) Parties shall be provided with an opportunity for a 3hearing during which they may be represented by counsel, 4present witnesses, and cross-examine opposing witnesses. 5Parties may request the hearing officer to issue subpoenas to 6direct the attendance and testimony of relevant witnesses and 7the production of relevant documents. Hearings shall be 8scheduled with reasonable promptness, provided that for 9hearings scheduled in all non-emergency situations, if 10requested by the defendant, the defendant shall have at least 1115 days after service of process to prepare for a hearing. For 12purposes of this subsection (c), "non-emergency situation" 13means any situation that does not reasonably constitute a 14threat to the public interest, safety, or welfare. If service 15is provided by mail, the 15-day period shall begin to run on 16the day that the notice is deposited in the mail. 17    (d) All oral testimony shall be sworn to under oath or 18affirmation. 19(Source: P.A. 94-616, eff. 1-1-06.) 20    (65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-6)21    Sec. 1-2.1-6. Rules of evidence shall not govern. 22    (a) The formal and technical rules of evidence do not 23apply in an adjudicatory hearing permitted under this 24Division. Evidence, including hearsay, may be admitted only if 25it is of a type commonly relied upon by reasonably prudent   HB3536- 14 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1persons in the conduct of their affairs.2    (b) A citation or notice of violation sworn to under oath 3or affirmation taken under certification under Section 1-109 4of the Code of Civil Procedure is prima facie evidence of the 5correctness of the facts specified therein. The standard for 6rebutting this presumption is a preponderance of the evidence. 7(Source: P.A. 90-516, eff. 1-1-98.) 8    Section 20. The Illinois Vehicle Code is amended by 9changing Section 11-208.3 as follows: 10    (625 ILCS 5/11-208.3)  (from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-208.3)11    Sec. 11-208.3. Administrative adjudication of violations 12of traffic regulations concerning the standing, parking, or 13condition of vehicles, automated traffic law violations, and 14automated speed enforcement system violations. 15    (a) Any municipality or county may provide by ordinance 16for a system of administrative adjudication of vehicular 17standing and parking violations and vehicle compliance 18violations as described in this subsection, automated traffic 19law violations as defined in Section 11-208.6, 11-208.9, or 2011-1201.1, and automated speed enforcement system violations 21as defined in Section 11-208.8. The administrative system 22shall have as its purpose the fair and efficient enforcement 23of municipal or county regulations through the administrative 24adjudication of automated speed enforcement system or   HB3536- 15 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1automated traffic law violations and violations of municipal 2or county ordinances regulating the standing and parking of 3vehicles, the condition and use of vehicle equipment, and the 4display of municipal or county wheel tax licenses within the 5municipality's or county's borders. The administrative system 6shall only have authority to adjudicate civil offenses 7carrying fines not in excess of $500 or requiring the 8completion of a traffic education program, or both, that occur 9after the effective date of the ordinance adopting such a 10system under this Section. For purposes of this Section, 11"compliance violation" means a violation of a municipal or 12county regulation governing the condition or use of equipment 13on a vehicle or governing the display of a municipal or county 14wheel tax license.15    (b) Any ordinance establishing a system of administrative 16adjudication under this Section shall provide for:17        (1) A traffic compliance administrator authorized to 18    adopt, distribute, and process parking, compliance, and 19    automated speed enforcement system or automated traffic 20    law violation notices and other notices required by this 21    Section, collect money paid as fines and penalties for 22    violation of parking and compliance ordinances and 23    automated speed enforcement system or automated traffic 24    law violations, and operate an administrative adjudication 25    system.26        (2) A parking, standing, compliance, automated speed   HB3536- 16 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    enforcement system, or automated traffic law violation 2    notice that shall specify or include the date, time, and 3    place of violation of a parking, standing, compliance, 4    automated speed enforcement system, or automated traffic 5    law regulation; the particular regulation violated; any 6    requirement to complete a traffic education program; the 7    fine and any penalty that may be assessed for late payment 8    or failure to complete a required traffic education 9    program, or both, when so provided by ordinance; the 10    vehicle make or a photograph of the vehicle; the state 11    registration number of the vehicle; and the identification 12    number of the person issuing the notice. With regard to 13    automated speed enforcement system or automated traffic 14    law violations, vehicle make shall be specified on the 15    automated speed enforcement system or automated traffic 16    law violation notice if the notice does not include a 17    photograph of the vehicle and the make is available and 18    readily discernible. With regard to municipalities or 19    counties with a population of 1 million or more, it shall 20    be grounds for dismissal of a parking violation if the 21    state registration number or vehicle make specified is 22    incorrect. The violation notice shall state that the 23    completion of any required traffic education program, the 24    payment of any indicated fine, and the payment of any 25    applicable penalty for late payment or failure to complete 26    a required traffic education program, or both, shall   HB3536- 17 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    operate as a final disposition of the violation. The 2    notice also shall contain information as to the 3    availability of a hearing in which the violation may be 4    contested on its merits. The violation notice shall 5    specify the time and manner in which a hearing may be had.6        (3) Service of a parking, standing, or compliance 7    violation notice by: (i) affixing the original or a 8    facsimile of the notice to an unlawfully parked or 9    standing vehicle; (ii) handing the notice to the operator 10    of a vehicle if he or she is present; or (iii) mailing the 11    notice to the address of the registered owner or lessee of 12    the cited vehicle as recorded with the Secretary of State 13    or the lessor of the motor vehicle within 30 days after the 14    Secretary of State or the lessor of the motor vehicle 15    notifies the municipality or county of the identity of the 16    owner or lessee of the vehicle, but not later than 90 days 17    after the date of the violation, except that in the case of 18    a lessee of a motor vehicle, service of a parking, 19    standing, or compliance violation notice may occur no 20    later than 210 days after the violation; and service of an 21    automated speed enforcement system or automated traffic 22    law violation notice by mail to the address of the 23    registered owner or lessee of the cited vehicle as 24    recorded with the Secretary of State or the lessor of the 25    motor vehicle within 30 days after the Secretary of State 26    or the lessor of the motor vehicle notifies the   HB3536- 18 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    municipality or county of the identity of the owner or 2    lessee of the vehicle, but not later than 90 days after the 3    violation, except that in the case of a lessee of a motor 4    vehicle, service of an automated traffic law violation 5    notice may occur no later than 210 days after the 6    violation. A person authorized by ordinance to issue and 7    serve parking, standing, and compliance violation notices 8    shall certify as to the correctness of the facts entered 9    on the violation notice by signing his or her name to the 10    notice at the time of service or, in the case of a notice 11    produced by a computerized device, by signing a single 12    certificate to be kept by the traffic compliance 13    administrator attesting to the correctness of all notices 14    produced by the device while it was under his or her 15    control. In the case of an automated traffic law 16    violation, the ordinance shall require a determination by 17    a technician employed or contracted by the municipality or 18    county that, based on inspection of recorded images, the 19    motor vehicle was being operated in violation of Section 20    11-208.6, 11-208.9, or 11-1201.1 or a local ordinance. If 21    the technician determines that the vehicle entered the 22    intersection as part of a funeral procession or in order 23    to yield the right-of-way to an emergency vehicle, a 24    citation shall not be issued. In municipalities with a 25    population of less than 1,000,000 inhabitants and counties 26    with a population of less than 3,000,000 inhabitants, the   HB3536- 19 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    automated traffic law ordinance shall require that all 2    determinations by a technician that a motor vehicle was 3    being operated in violation of Section 11-208.6, 11-208.9, 4    or 11-1201.1 or a local ordinance must be reviewed and 5    approved by a law enforcement officer or retired law 6    enforcement officer of the municipality or county issuing 7    the violation. In municipalities with a population of 8    1,000,000 or more inhabitants and counties with a 9    population of 3,000,000 or more inhabitants, the automated 10    traffic law ordinance shall require that all 11    determinations by a technician that a motor vehicle was 12    being operated in violation of Section 11-208.6, 11-208.9, 13    or 11-1201.1 or a local ordinance must be reviewed and 14    approved by a law enforcement officer or retired law 15    enforcement officer of the municipality or county issuing 16    the violation or by an additional fully trained reviewing 17    technician who is not employed by the contractor who 18    employs the technician who made the initial determination. 19    In the case of an automated speed enforcement system 20    violation, the ordinance shall require a determination by 21    a technician employed by the municipality, based upon an 22    inspection of recorded images, video or other 23    documentation, including documentation of the speed limit 24    and automated speed enforcement signage, and documentation 25    of the inspection, calibration, and certification of the 26    speed equipment, that the vehicle was being operated in   HB3536- 20 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    violation of Article VI of Chapter 11 of this Code or a 2    similar local ordinance. If the technician determines that 3    the vehicle speed was not determined by a calibrated, 4    certified speed equipment device based upon the speed 5    equipment documentation, or if the vehicle was an 6    emergency vehicle, a citation may not be issued. The 7    automated speed enforcement ordinance shall require that 8    all determinations by a technician that a violation 9    occurred be reviewed and approved by a law enforcement 10    officer or retired law enforcement officer of the 11    municipality issuing the violation or by an additional 12    fully trained reviewing technician who is not employed by 13    the contractor who employs the technician who made the 14    initial determination. Routine and independent calibration 15    of the speeds produced by automated speed enforcement 16    systems and equipment shall be conducted annually by a 17    qualified technician. Speeds produced by an automated 18    speed enforcement system shall be compared with speeds 19    produced by lidar or other independent equipment. Radar or 20    lidar equipment shall undergo an internal validation test 21    no less frequently than once each week. Qualified 22    technicians shall test loop-based equipment no less 23    frequently than once a year. Radar equipment shall be 24    checked for accuracy by a qualified technician when the 25    unit is serviced, when unusual or suspect readings 26    persist, or when deemed necessary by a reviewing   HB3536- 21 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    technician. Radar equipment shall be checked with the 2    internal frequency generator and the internal circuit test 3    whenever the radar is turned on. Technicians must be alert 4    for any unusual or suspect readings, and if unusual or 5    suspect readings of a radar unit persist, that unit shall 6    immediately be removed from service and not returned to 7    service until it has been checked by a qualified 8    technician and determined to be functioning properly. 9    Documentation of the annual calibration results, including 10    the equipment tested, test date, technician performing the 11    test, and test results, shall be maintained and available 12    for use in the determination of an automated speed 13    enforcement system violation and issuance of a citation. 14    The technician performing the calibration and testing of 15    the automated speed enforcement equipment shall be trained 16    and certified in the use of equipment for speed 17    enforcement purposes. Training on the speed enforcement 18    equipment may be conducted by law enforcement, civilian, 19    or manufacturer's personnel and if applicable may be 20    equivalent to the equipment use and operations training 21    included in the Speed Measuring Device Operator Program 22    developed by the National Highway Traffic Safety 23    Administration (NHTSA). The vendor or technician who 24    performs the work shall keep accurate records on each 25    piece of equipment the technician calibrates and tests. As 26    used in this paragraph, "fully trained reviewing   HB3536- 22 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    technician" means a person who has received at least 40 2    hours of supervised training in subjects which shall 3    include image inspection and interpretation, the elements 4    necessary to prove a violation, license plate 5    identification, and traffic safety and management. In all 6    municipalities and counties, the automated speed 7    enforcement system or automated traffic law ordinance 8    shall require that no additional fee shall be charged to 9    the alleged violator for exercising his or her right to an 10    administrative hearing, and persons shall be given at 11    least 25 days following an administrative hearing to pay 12    any civil penalty imposed by a finding that Section 13    11-208.6, 11-208.8, 11-208.9, or 11-1201.1 or a similar 14    local ordinance has been violated. The original or a 15    facsimile of the violation notice or, in the case of a 16    notice produced by a computerized device, a printed record 17    generated by the device showing the facts entered on the 18    notice, shall be retained by the traffic compliance 19    administrator, and shall be a record kept in the ordinary 20    course of business. A parking, standing, compliance, 21    automated speed enforcement system, or automated traffic 22    law violation notice issued, signed, and served in 23    accordance with this Section, a copy of the notice, or the 24    computer-generated record shall be prima facie correct and 25    shall be prima facie evidence of the correctness of the 26    facts shown on the notice. The notice, copy, or   HB3536- 23 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    computer-generated record shall be admissible in any 2    subsequent administrative or legal proceedings.3        (4) An opportunity for a hearing for the registered 4    owner of the vehicle cited in the parking, standing, 5    compliance, automated speed enforcement system, or 6    automated traffic law violation notice in which the owner 7    may contest the merits of the alleged violation, and 8    during which formal or technical rules of evidence shall 9    not apply; provided, however, that under Section 11-1306 10    of this Code the lessee of a vehicle cited in the violation 11    notice likewise shall be provided an opportunity for a 12    hearing of the same kind afforded the registered owner. 13    All oral testimony given at the hearing shall be under 14    oath. The hearings shall be recorded, and the person 15    conducting the hearing on behalf of the traffic compliance 16    administrator shall be empowered to administer oaths and 17    to secure by subpoena both the attendance and testimony of 18    witnesses and the production of relevant books and papers. 19    During the hearing, a citation or notice of violation 20    sworn to under oath or affirmation taken under 21    certification under Section 1-109 of the Code of Civil 22    Procedure is prima facie evidence of the correctness of 23    the facts specified therein and the standard for rebutting 24    this presumption is a preponderance of the evidence. 25    Persons appearing at a hearing under this Section may be 26    represented by counsel at their expense. The ordinance may   HB3536- 24 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    also provide for internal administrative review following 2    the decision of the hearing officer.3        (5) Service of additional notices, sent by first class 4    United States mail, postage prepaid, to the address of the 5    registered owner of the cited vehicle as recorded with the 6    Secretary of State or, if any notice to that address is 7    returned as undeliverable, to the last known address 8    recorded in a United States Post Office approved database, 9    or, under Section 11-1306 or subsection (p) of Section 10    11-208.6 or 11-208.9, or subsection (p) of Section 11    11-208.8 of this Code, to the lessee of the cited vehicle 12    at the last address known to the lessor of the cited 13    vehicle at the time of lease or, if any notice to that 14    address is returned as undeliverable, to the last known 15    address recorded in a United States Post Office approved 16    database. The service shall be deemed complete as of the 17    date of deposit in the United States mail. The notices 18    shall be in the following sequence and shall include, but 19    not be limited to, the information specified herein:20            (i) A second notice of parking, standing, or 21        compliance violation if the first notice of the 22        violation was issued by affixing the original or a 23        facsimile of the notice to the unlawfully parked 24        vehicle or by handing the notice to the operator. This 25        notice shall specify or include the date and location 26        of the violation cited in the parking, standing, or   HB3536- 25 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1        compliance violation notice, the particular regulation 2        violated, the vehicle make or a photograph of the 3        vehicle, the state registration number of the vehicle, 4        any requirement to complete a traffic education 5        program, the fine and any penalty that may be assessed 6        for late payment or failure to complete a traffic 7        education program, or both, when so provided by 8        ordinance, the availability of a hearing in which the 9        violation may be contested on its merits, and the time 10        and manner in which the hearing may be had. The notice 11        of violation shall also state that failure to complete 12        a required traffic education program, to pay the 13        indicated fine and any applicable penalty, or to 14        appear at a hearing on the merits in the time and 15        manner specified, will result in a final determination 16        of violation liability for the cited violation in the 17        amount of the fine or penalty indicated, and that, 18        upon the occurrence of a final determination of 19        violation liability for the failure, and the 20        exhaustion of, or failure to exhaust, available 21        administrative or judicial procedures for review, any 22        incomplete traffic education program or any unpaid 23        fine or penalty, or both, will constitute a debt due 24        and owing the municipality or county.25            (ii) A notice of final determination of parking, 26        standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement   HB3536- 26 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1        system, or automated traffic law violation liability. 2        This notice shall be sent following a final 3        determination of parking, standing, compliance, 4        automated speed enforcement system, or automated 5        traffic law violation liability and the conclusion of 6        judicial review procedures taken under this Section. 7        The notice shall state that the incomplete traffic 8        education program or the unpaid fine or penalty, or 9        both, is a debt due and owing the municipality or 10        county. The notice shall contain warnings that failure 11        to complete any required traffic education program or 12        to pay any fine or penalty due and owing the 13        municipality or county, or both, within the time 14        specified may result in the municipality's or county's 15        filing of a petition in the Circuit Court to have the 16        incomplete traffic education program or unpaid fine or 17        penalty, or both, rendered a judgment as provided by 18        this Section, or, where applicable, may result in 19        suspension of the person's driver's license for 20        failure to complete a traffic education program. 21        (6) A notice of impending driver's license suspension. 22    This notice shall be sent to the person liable for failure 23    to complete a required traffic education program. The 24    notice shall state that failure to complete a required 25    traffic education program within 45 days of the notice's 26    date will result in the municipality or county notifying   HB3536- 27 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    the Secretary of State that the person is eligible for 2    initiation of suspension proceedings under Section 6-306.5 3    of this Code. The notice shall also state that the person 4    may obtain a photostatic copy of an original ticket 5    imposing a fine or penalty by sending a self-addressed, 6    stamped envelope to the municipality or county along with 7    a request for the photostatic copy. The notice of 8    impending driver's license suspension shall be sent by 9    first class United States mail, postage prepaid, to the 10    address recorded with the Secretary of State or, if any 11    notice to that address is returned as undeliverable, to 12    the last known address recorded in a United States Post 13    Office approved database. 14        (7) Final determinations of violation liability. A 15    final determination of violation liability shall occur 16    following failure to complete the required traffic 17    education program or to pay the fine or penalty, or both, 18    after a hearing officer's determination of violation 19    liability and the exhaustion of or failure to exhaust any 20    administrative review procedures provided by ordinance. 21    Where a person fails to appear at a hearing to contest the 22    alleged violation in the time and manner specified in a 23    prior mailed notice, the hearing officer's determination 24    of violation liability shall become final: (A) upon denial 25    of a timely petition to set aside that determination, or 26    (B) upon expiration of the period for filing the petition   HB3536- 28 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    without a filing having been made.2        (8) A petition to set aside a determination of 3    parking, standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement 4    system, or automated traffic law violation liability that 5    may be filed by a person owing an unpaid fine or penalty. A 6    petition to set aside a determination of liability may 7    also be filed by a person required to complete a traffic 8    education program. The petition shall be filed with and 9    ruled upon by the traffic compliance administrator in the 10    manner and within the time specified by ordinance. The 11    grounds for the petition may be limited to: (A) the person 12    not having been the owner or lessee of the cited vehicle on 13    the date the violation notice was issued, (B) the person 14    having already completed the required traffic education 15    program or paid the fine or penalty, or both, for the 16    violation in question, and (C) excusable failure to appear 17    at or request a new date for a hearing. With regard to 18    municipalities or counties with a population of 1 million 19    or more, it shall be grounds for dismissal of a parking 20    violation if the state registration number or vehicle 21    make, only if specified in the violation notice, is 22    incorrect. After the determination of parking, standing, 23    compliance, automated speed enforcement system, or 24    automated traffic law violation liability has been set 25    aside upon a showing of just cause, the registered owner 26    shall be provided with a hearing on the merits for that   HB3536- 29 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    violation.2        (9) Procedures for non-residents. Procedures by which 3    persons who are not residents of the municipality or 4    county may contest the merits of the alleged violation 5    without attending a hearing.6        (10) A schedule of civil fines for violations of 7    vehicular standing, parking, compliance, automated speed 8    enforcement system, or automated traffic law regulations 9    enacted by ordinance pursuant to this Section, and a 10    schedule of penalties for late payment of the fines or 11    failure to complete required traffic education programs, 12    provided, however, that the total amount of the fine and 13    penalty for any one violation shall not exceed $250, 14    except as provided in subsection (c) of Section 11-1301.3 15    of this Code. 16        (11) Other provisions as are necessary and proper to 17    carry into effect the powers granted and purposes stated 18    in this Section.19    (b-5) An automated speed enforcement system or automated 20traffic law ordinance adopted under this Section by a 21municipality or county shall require that the determination to 22issue a citation be vested solely with the municipality or 23county and that such authority may not be delegated to any 24vendor retained by the municipality or county. Any contract or 25agreement violating such a provision in the ordinance is null 26and void.   HB3536- 30 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    (c) Any municipality or county establishing vehicular 2standing, parking, compliance, automated speed enforcement 3system, or automated traffic law regulations under this 4Section may also provide by ordinance for a program of vehicle 5immobilization for the purpose of facilitating enforcement of 6those regulations. The program of vehicle immobilization shall 7provide for immobilizing any eligible vehicle upon the public 8way by presence of a restraint in a manner to prevent operation 9of the vehicle. Any ordinance establishing a program of 10vehicle immobilization under this Section shall provide:11        (1) Criteria for the designation of vehicles eligible 12    for immobilization. A vehicle shall be eligible for 13    immobilization when the registered owner of the vehicle 14    has accumulated the number of incomplete traffic education 15    programs or unpaid final determinations of parking, 16    standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement system, 17    or automated traffic law violation liability, or both, as 18    determined by ordinance.19        (2) A notice of impending vehicle immobilization and a 20    right to a hearing to challenge the validity of the notice 21    by disproving liability for the incomplete traffic 22    education programs or unpaid final determinations of 23    parking, standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement 24    system, or automated traffic law violation liability, or 25    both, listed on the notice.26        (3) The right to a prompt hearing after a vehicle has   HB3536- 31 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    been immobilized or subsequently towed without the 2    completion of the required traffic education program or 3    payment of the outstanding fines and penalties on parking, 4    standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement system, 5    or automated traffic law violations, or both, for which 6    final determinations have been issued. An order issued 7    after the hearing is a final administrative decision 8    within the meaning of Section 3-101 of the Code of Civil 9    Procedure.10        (4) A post immobilization and post-towing notice 11    advising the registered owner of the vehicle of the right 12    to a hearing to challenge the validity of the impoundment.13    (d) Judicial review of final determinations of parking, 14standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement system, or 15automated traffic law violations and final administrative 16decisions issued after hearings regarding vehicle 17immobilization and impoundment made under this Section shall 18be subject to the provisions of the Administrative Review Law.19    (e) Any fine, penalty, incomplete traffic education 20program, or part of any fine or any penalty remaining unpaid 21after the exhaustion of, or the failure to exhaust, 22administrative remedies created under this Section and the 23conclusion of any judicial review procedures shall be a debt 24due and owing the municipality or county and, as such, may be 25collected in accordance with applicable law. Completion of any 26required traffic education program and payment in full of any   HB3536- 32 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1fine or penalty resulting from a standing, parking, 2compliance, automated speed enforcement system, or automated 3traffic law violation shall constitute a final disposition of 4that violation. 5    (f) After the expiration of the period within which 6judicial review may be sought for a final determination of 7parking, standing, compliance, automated speed enforcement 8system, or automated traffic law violation, the municipality 9or county may commence a proceeding in the Circuit Court for 10purposes of obtaining a judgment on the final determination of 11violation. Nothing in this Section shall prevent a 12municipality or county from consolidating multiple final 13determinations of parking, standing, compliance, automated 14speed enforcement system, or automated traffic law violations 15against a person in a proceeding. Upon commencement of the 16action, the municipality or county shall file a certified copy 17or record of the final determination of parking, standing, 18compliance, automated speed enforcement system, or automated 19traffic law violation, which shall be accompanied by a 20certification that recites facts sufficient to show that the 21final determination of violation was issued in accordance with 22this Section and the applicable municipal or county ordinance. 23Service of the summons and a copy of the petition may be by any 24method provided by Section 2-203 of the Code of Civil 25Procedure or by certified mail, return receipt requested, 26provided that the total amount of fines and penalties for   HB3536- 33 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1final determinations of parking, standing, compliance, 2automated speed enforcement system, or automated traffic law 3violations does not exceed $2500. If the court is satisfied 4that the final determination of parking, standing, compliance, 5automated speed enforcement system, or automated traffic law 6violation was entered in accordance with the requirements of 7this Section and the applicable municipal or county ordinance, 8and that the registered owner or the lessee, as the case may 9be, had an opportunity for an administrative hearing and for 10judicial review as provided in this Section, the court shall 11render judgment in favor of the municipality or county and 12against the registered owner or the lessee for the amount 13indicated in the final determination of parking, standing, 14compliance, automated speed enforcement system, or automated 15traffic law violation, plus costs. The judgment shall have the 16same effect and may be enforced in the same manner as other 17judgments for the recovery of money.18    (g) The fee for participating in a traffic education 19program under this Section shall not exceed $25.20    A low-income individual required to complete a traffic 21education program under this Section who provides proof of 22eligibility for the federal earned income tax credit under 23Section 32 of the Internal Revenue Code or the Illinois earned 24income tax credit under Section 212 of the Illinois Income Tax 25Act shall not be required to pay any fee for participating in a 26required traffic education program.   HB3536- 34 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1    (h) Notwithstanding any other provision of law to the 2contrary, a person shall not be liable for violations, fees, 3fines, or penalties under this Section during the period in 4which the motor vehicle was stolen or hijacked, as indicated 5in a report to the appropriate law enforcement agency filed in 6a timely manner.7(Source: P.A. 102-558, eff. 8-20-21; 102-905, eff. 1-1-23; 8103-364, eff. 7-28-23.) 9    Section 25. The Criminal Code of 2012 is amended by 10changing Section 32-2 as follows: 11    (720 ILCS 5/32-2)  (from Ch. 38, par. 32-2)12    Sec. 32-2. Perjury. 13    (a) A person commits perjury when, under oath, 14certification, or affirmation, in a proceeding or in any other 15matter where by law the oath, certification, or affirmation is 16required, he or she makes a false statement, material to the 17issue or point in question, knowing the statement is false.18    (b) Proof of Falsity.19    An indictment or information for perjury alleging that the 20offender, under oath, certification, or affirmation, has 21knowingly made contradictory statements, material to the issue 22or point in question, in the same or in different proceedings, 23where the oath, certification, or affirmation is required, 24need not specify which statement is false. At the trial, the   HB3536- 35 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1prosecution need not establish which statement is false.2    (c) Admission of Falsity.3    Where the contradictory statements are made in the same 4continuous trial, an admission by the offender in that same 5continuous trial of the falsity of a contradictory statement 6shall bar prosecution therefor under any provisions of this 7Code.8    (d) A person shall be exempt from prosecution under 9subsection (a) of this Section if he or she is a peace officer 10who uses a false or fictitious name in the enforcement of the 11criminal laws, and this use is approved in writing as provided 12in Section 10-1 of "The Liquor Control Act of 1934", as 13amended, Section 5 of "An Act in relation to the use of an 14assumed name in the conduct or transaction of business in this 15State", approved July 17, 1941, as amended, or Section 162605-200 of the Illinois State Police Law. However, this 17exemption shall not apply to testimony in judicial proceedings 18where the identity of the peace officer is material to the 19issue, and he or she is ordered by the court to disclose his or 20her identity.21    (e) Sentence.22    Perjury is a Class 3 felony.23(Source: P.A. 102-538, eff. 8-20-21.) 24    Section 30. The Local Governmental and Governmental 25Employees Tort Immunity Act is amended by adding Sections   HB3536- 36 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b11-211 and 2-215 as follows: 2    (745 ILCS 10/1-211 new)3    Sec. 1-211. "Administrative law judge" means an 4independent contractor or employee compensated by a local 5public entity who serves in a quasi-judicial function 6regardless of the independent contractor's title. 7    (745 ILCS 10/2-215 new)8    Sec. 2-215. Administrative law judge and hearing officer. 9An administrative law judge or hearing officer is not 10answerable personally in law or equity for the direct or 11indirect consequences of any finding of fact or conclusion of 12law made by the administrative law judge or hearing officer in 13the course of the administrative law judge's or hearing 14officer's official duties.  HB3536- 37 -LRB104 07558 RTM 17602 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    5 ILCS 255/1from Ch. 101, par. 14    55 ILCS 5/5-430105    55 ILCS 5/5-430206    55 ILCS 5/5-430257    55 ILCS 5/5-430308    65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-29    65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-410    65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-511    65 ILCS 5/1-2.1-612    625 ILCS 5/11-208.3from Ch. 95 1/2, par. 11-208.313    720 ILCS 5/32-2from Ch. 38, par. 32-214    745 ILCS 10/1-211 new15    745 ILCS 10/2-215 new